Delaware, session 153, SB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part I, Title 3 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 3A. Delaware Farm to Community Program Â§ 301A. Purpose. The Delaware Farm to Community Programâs purpose is to do all of the following: (1) Codify the Farm to Community Program. (2) Continue to implement the Farm to Community Programâs effective model. (3) Extend the purchasing power of community outlets to procure and distribute local food products. (4) Stimulate increased food production by adding market demand and predictability for Delaware farmers. (5) Expand the availability of healthy and seasonal foods by adding food transportation and site distribution capacity. (6) Ultimately build resilience across Delawareâs food system. Â§ 302A. Definitions. As used in this chapter: (1) âCommunity outletâ means a business entity, organization, or institution that operates a food distribution program in this State and is equipped to procure, source, store, and distribute the local food products, value-added products, or both, in this State. (2) âDepartmentâ means the Delaware Department of Agriculture. (3) âFarmerâ means an individual or business entity that produces, sells, donates, or transports local food products. (4) âFood distribution siteâ means a physical location in this State where local food products are available at no cost to consumers. âFood distribution siteâ includes, a food pantry, food closet within a faith-based institution, community-based organization, congregate meal site, community center, senior center, community refrigerator, shelter, school, childcare facility, or facility participating as part of a Food is Medicine initiative. (5) âLocal food productsâ means value-added products and fresh or lightly processed fruits, vegetables, meat, dairy, and eggs that are produced, by a farmer or processor, in 1 or more of the following states: a. Delaware. b. Maryland. c. New Jersey. d. Pennsylvania. e. Virginia. (6) âLFPA programâ means the United States Department of Agricultureâs Local Food Purchase Assistance Cooperative Agreement program established in 2022. (7) âProcessorâ means a business entity that operates machinery or equipment to perform manual tasks to wash, cut, measure, mix, cook, preserve through processes like canning or smoking, butcher, package, or transform raw ingredients into consumable food products that are derived from local food products. (8) âProgramâ means the Delaware Farm to Community Program established in this chapter. (9) âValue-added productsâ means raw agricultural commodities that have been processed, packaged, or marketed uniquely to increase the market value, extend shelf life, and improve consumer appeal. âValue-added productsâ include raw ingredients converted into jams, cheeses, sausages, or pre-cut vegetables. Â§ 303A. Delaware Farm to Community Program; Establishment; Administration. (a) Subject to funding as provided in Â§ 306A of this title, the Department, in coordination with the Delaware Farm and Food Council, shall establish and administer the Delaware Farm to Community Program to carry out the purpose established under Â§ 301A of this title. (b) In administering the Program, the Department shall coordinate with the Delaware Farm and Food Council to do all of the following: (1) Establish requirements for all of the following: a. Participating in the Program. b. Applying for, receiving, and using Program funds, including prioritizing procuring local food products from farmers and processors located in Delaware. c. Reporting on the use of the funds, including a breakdown of expenses. (2) Evaluate community outlets to determine if the community outlets are eligible to participate in the Program. (3) Facilitate communication and contact between community outlets and farmers. (4) Ensure Program participants comply with state and federal food safety standards, including by providing technical assistance or by facilitating access to resources for technical assistance. (5) Establish reporting requirements for community outlets participating in the Program. (c) To implement the Program, the Department may do any of the following: (1) Enter into cooperative agreements, contracts, or subawards with community outlets to carry out the procurement, aggregation, storage, and distribution of local food products. (2) Grant funds to community outlets with an active program agreement under Â§ 304A(b)(1) of this title to do 1 or more of the following: a. Procure local food products from farmers, processors, or both, and distribute the local food products in this State through 1 or more food distribution sites, delivery to residences, or both. The local food products may be gleaned as part of a second or third harvest and made for sale, discounted sale, or donation to a community outlet. b. Offer an increased payment, at a fixed rate, to a farmer that will pick up and transport local food products from 1 or more farms not operated by the farmer and deliver the local food products to 1 or more food distribution sites or community outlets participating in the Program. (3) Collaborate with agricultural organizations, other state agencies, and nonstate entities to promote and advance the Program. (4) Coordinate with other state agencies to do any of the following: a. Disburse funds to eligible community outlets. b. Ensure that community outlets participating in the Program comply with the requirements of the Program. c. Annually review funding allocations made and reports submitted under this chapter. (5) Adopt rules and regulations to implement this chapter. Â§ 304A. Eligibility; Program agreement. (a) If a community outlet is interested in participating in the Program, the Department shall coordinate with the Delaware Farm and Food Council to determine the community outletâs eligibility to participate in the Program by doing all of the following: (1) Conducting a pre-approval site visit with the community outlet to assess and gather information about all of the following: a. Physical location and capacity to safely handle fresh or frozen products that may require adherence to specific storage and handling standards. b. Administrative capability to procure, store, and distribute local food products. c. Procedures related to the food distribution program administered by the community outlet. d. Volume of food or meals handled or distributed as part of the food distribution program administered by the community outlet. (2) Verifying the population served by the community outlet and the extent to which the community outlet provides services to underserved populations. (b)(1) If a community outlet is determined to be eligible to participate in the Program, the Department shall coordinate with the Delaware Farm and Food Council to e nter into a program agreement with the community outlet that defines the terms and conditions for participating in the Program. To participate in the Program, a community outlet must have an active program agreement under this paragraph (b)(1). (2) The Department may share a program agreement entered into under paragraph (b)(1) of this section with other state agencies, as provided by Â§ 303A(c)(4) of this title. Â§ 305A. Allocation and use of funds; Subcontracts and subawards. (a)(1) A community outlet must use funds granted under this chapter only for 1 or more of the following purposes: a. To procure local food products. A community outlet may procure local food products from a farmer or processor located in Maryland, New Jersey, Pennsylvania, or Virginia, only if at least 1 of the following conditions apply: 1. The funds are first used to procure local food products from farmers, processors, or both, located in this State. 2. The type or quantity of local food products is not available or accessible from a farmer or processor located in this State. b. To distribute the local food products in this State. (2) A community outlet may use no more than 10% of the funds for incremental overhead costs, including administrative costs, transportation or delivery fees, supplies, and payment of staff or subcontractors to carry out work under a program agreement entered into under Â§ 304A(b)(1) of this title. (b) Subject to the Departmentâs regulations, a community outlet may enter into subcontracts and provide subawards to partner or collaborate with an individual or entity to implement a program agreement entered into under Â§ 304A(b)(1) of this title. Â§ 306A. Funding. (a) The General Assembly may make appropriations to the Department to implement and administer the Program. In addition to state appropriations, the Department may do 1 or more of the following to implement and administer the Program: (1) Accept federal moneys, foundation grants, private donations, and corporate partnerships. (2) Use funds designated for the Farm to Community Program. (b) If the United States Department of Agriculture resumes the LFPA program, or establishes a new local food purchase assistance program, the Department shall coordinate with the Delaware Farm and Food Council to secure funding from the LFPA program, or the new local food purchase assistance program, to help implement the Program. Â§ 307A. Program reporting. For each growing season that the Program is implemented, the Department, in coordination with the Delaware Farm and Food Council, shall make information about the Programâs output publicly available, including all of the following: (1) The total community outlets participating in the Program . (2) The total farmers participating in the Program. (3) The total food distribution sites receiving local food products procured as part of the Program. (4) The total dollar value of local food products procured as part of the Program. (5) Geographic location of food distribution sites receiving local food products as part of the Program.